Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201881-3711
Commission; duties.

The commission shall:

(1) Administer the Nebraska Visitors Development Act;

(2) Prepare and approve a budget;

(3) Elect a chairperson and vice-chairperson;

(4) Procure and evaluate data and information necessary for the proper administration of the act;

(5) Appoint an executive director at a salary to be fixed by the commission to conduct the day-to-day operations of the commission;

(6) Employ personnel and contract for services which are necessary for the proper operation of the commission;

(7) Establish a means by which any interested person has the opportunity at least annually to offer his or her ideas and suggestions relative to the commission's duties for the upcoming year;

(8) Authorize the expenditure of funds and contracting of expenditures to carry out the act;

(9) Keep minutes of its meetings and other books and records which clearly reflect all of the actions and transactions of the commission and keep such records open to examination during normal business hours;

(10) Prohibit any funds appropriated to the commission from being expended directly or indirectly to promote or oppose any candidate for public office or to influence state or federal legislation;

(11) Have authority to mark significant tourism attractions as provided in section 81-3711.01;

(12) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Nebraska Visitors Development Act;

(13) Develop and administer a program to provide promotional services, technical assistance, and state aid to local governments and the tourism industry;

(14) Establish written policies and procedures governing the executive director and the personnel of the commission in the expenditure and use of funds appropriated to the commission;

(15) Cooperate with federal, state, and local governments and private individuals and organizations to carry out any of the functions of the commission and purposes of the Nebraska Visitors Development Act; and

(16) Actively coordinate and develop working partnerships with other state agencies, including, but not limited to, the Commission on Indian Affairs, the Department of Economic Development, the Game and Parks Commission, the Nebraska Arts Council, the Nebraska State Historical Society, and the University of Nebraska.

Laws 2012, LB1053, § 11;

Laws 2015, LB449, § 14;

Laws 2017, LB222, § 6.